District of Columbia statutes.
47-4665.03

The Advisory Board Company — compliance.

(a)

If the Mayor, pursuant to § 2-219.03a, determines that the Company is in compliance with the hiring requirements of §§ 47-4665.01 through 47-4665.05 and the incentive agreement, the Company shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions of part A of subchapter X of Chapter 2 of Title 2 of the District of Columbia Official Code.

(b)

On or before October 31, the Company shall provide the Mayor with the following information pertaining to the previous tax year:

(1)

A detailed report as of the annual reporting date that identifies the:

(A)

Number of employees whose primary workplace is located in the District;

(B)

Number of District resident employees;

(C)

Median salary of the District resident employees;

(D)

Median tenure of District resident employees; and

(E)

Total employment baseline; and

(2)

A certification of compliance with the Community Benefits Agreement.

(c)

The Company shall comply with the requirements contained in § 2-218.46, with regard to the Project.

History

Feb. 26, 2016, D.C. Law 21-71, § 2(b), 63 DCR 1